Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.129, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Direct negotiation. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 471.345, if the estimated total contractual obligation of the council for a directly negotiated contract or contracts for construction work or maintenance work on any single project does not exceed the amount in section 161.32, subdivision 2, the council may enter into a contract by direct negotiation by obtaining two or more quotations for the work without advertising for bids or otherwise complying with the requirements of competitive bidding. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.142, is amended to read: 473.142 SMALL BUSINESSES. (a) The Metropolitan Council and agencies specified in section 473.143, subdivision 1, may award deleted text begin up todeleted text end a deleted text begin six percentdeleted text end preference deleted text begin in the amount biddeleted text end new text begin up to the percentage under section 16C.16, subdivision 6, paragraph (a),new text end for specified goods or services to small targeted group businesses and veteran-owned small businesses designated under section 16C.16.new text begin The council and each agency specified in section 473.143, subdivision 1, may award a preference up to the percentage under section 161.321, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), in the amount bid for specified construction work to small targeted group businesses and veteran-owned small businesses designated under section 16C.16.new text end (b) The council and each agency specified in section 473.143, subdivision 1, may designate a deleted text begin purchase ofdeleted text end new text begin contract for construction,new text end goodsnew text begin ,new text end or services for award only to small targeted group businesses designated under section 16C.16 if the council or agency determines that at least three small targeted group businesses are likely to deleted text begin biddeleted text end new text begin respond to a solicitationnew text end . The council and each agency specified in section 473.143, subdivision 1, may designate a deleted text begin purchase ofdeleted text end new text begin contract for construction,new text end goodsnew text begin ,new text end or services for award only to veteran-owned small businesses designated under section 16C.16 if the council or agency determines that at least three veteran-owned small businesses are likely to deleted text begin biddeleted text end new text begin respond to a solicitationnew text end . (c) The council and each agency specified in section 473.143, subdivision 1, as a condition of awarding deleted text begin a construction contractdeleted text end or approving a contract deleted text begin for consultant, professional, or technical servicesdeleted text end , may set goals that require the prime contractor to subcontract a portion of the contract to small targeted group businesses and veteran-owned small businesses designated under section 16C.16. The council or agency must establish a procedure for granting waivers from the subcontracting requirement when qualified small targeted group businesses and veteran-owned small businesses are not reasonably available. The council or agency may establish financial incentives for prime contractors who exceed the goals for use of subcontractors and financial penalties for prime contractors who fail to meet goals under this paragraph. The subcontracting requirements of this paragraph do not apply to prime contractors who are small targeted group businesses and veteran-owned small businesses. At least 75 percent of the value of the subcontracts awarded to small targeted group businesses under this paragraph must be performed by the business to which the subcontract is awarded or by another small targeted group business. At least 75 percent of the value of the subcontracts awarded to veteran-owned small businesses under this paragraph must be performed by the business to which the subcontract is awarded or another veteran-owned small business. (d) The council and each agency listed in section 473.143, subdivision 1, deleted text begin are encouraged to purchase fromdeleted text end new text begin may award a contract for construction, goods, or services directly tonew text end small targeted group businesses deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ornew text end veteran-owned small businesses designated under section 16C.16 deleted text begin when making purchases that are not subject to competitive bidding proceduresdeleted text end new text begin , up to a total contract award value, including extension options, of the amount specified in section 16C.16, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), without going through a competitive solicitation processnew text end . (e) The council and each agency may adopt rules to implement this section. (f) Each council or agency contract must require the prime contractor to pay any subcontractor within ten days of the prime contractor's receipt of payment from the council or agency for undisputed services provided by the subcontractor. The contract must require the prime contractor to pay interest of 1-1/2 percent per month or any part of a month to the subcontractor on any undisputed amount not paid on time to the subcontractor. The minimum monthly interest penalty payment for an unpaid balance of $100 or more is $10. For an unpaid balance of less than $100, the prime contractor shall pay the actual penalty due to the subcontractor. A subcontractor who prevails in a civil action to collect interest penalties from a prime contractor must be awarded its costs and disbursements, including attorney fees, incurred in bringing the action. (g) This section does not apply to procurement financed in whole or in part with federal funds if the procurement is subject to federal disadvantaged, minority, or women business enterprise regulations. The council and each agency shall report to the commissioner of administration on compliance with this section. The information must be reported at the time and in the manner requested by the commissioner. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.1425, is amended to read: 473.1425 WORKING CAPITAL FUND. The Metropolitan Council or a metropolitan agency defined in section 473.121, subdivision 5a, to the extent allowed by other law or contract, may grant available money that has been appropriated for socially or economically disadvantaged business programs to a guaranty fund administered by a nonprofit organization that makes or guarantees working capital loans to businesses owned and operated bynew text begin anew text end socially deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin andnew text end economically disadvantaged deleted text begin personsdeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section deleted text begin 23.5deleted text end new text begin 26.5new text end . The purpose of loans made or guaranteed by the organization must be to provide short-term working capital to enable eligible businesses to deleted text begin be awardeddeleted text end new text begin participate innew text end contracts for goods and services or for construction related services from government agencies. Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end